test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_EED_gt-norm.yaml
     gayéed+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: gayéed
     gayéed+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gayéedga
     gayéed+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gayéed
     gayéed+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gayéedang
     gayéed+V+DIRECT+PAST: gayéedan
     gayéed+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gayéedaa
     gayéed+V+INDIRECT+PAST: gayéedaan
     gayéed+V+RELATIVE: gayéeds
     gayéed+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: gayéedaas
     gayéed+V+NON_FACTIVE: gayéedang
     gayéed+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: gayéedaa.ang
     gayéed+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gayéedang
     gayéed+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gayéedanggang
     gayéed+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: gayéedangang
     gayéed+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéediinii
     gayéed+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéedaangaa
     gayéed+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéedaangaan
     gayéed+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: gayéedäsaa
     gayéed+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: gayéedäs
     gayéed+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: gayéedäsaang
     gayéed+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: gayéedäsga
     gayéed+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: gayéedäsaas
     gayéed+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: gayéedäsaa.ang
     gayéed+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gayéedang k̲asa'áa
     gayéed+V+NEAR+FUTURE: gayéedang k̲asa'áang
     gayéed+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gayéedang k̲asaasdláa
     gayéed+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gayéedang k̲asaasdláang
     gayéed+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gayéed'uuj
     gayéed+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gayéed'uujang
     gayéed+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: gayéedäsaa'uujang
     gayéed+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: gayéed'us
     gayéed+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gayéed'ujaa
     gayéed+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'uujaangaa
     gayéed+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: gayéedäsaa'us
     gayéed+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: gayéed'ahlanggang
     gayéed+V+CERTAIN+PAST: gayéed'ahlanggan
     gayéed+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'ahlanggiinii
     gayéed+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: gayéedäsaa'ahlans
     gayéed+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: gayéed'ahlans
     gayéed+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: gayéedaa'ahlang
     gayéed+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: gayéedaa'ahlanggaa
     gayéed+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: gayéedaa'ahlanggang
     gayéed+V+REFLEXIVE: gayéed'ahl
     gayéed+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: gayéedäseehl
     gayéed+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: gayéed'uu
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gayéed'waa
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gayéed'waa
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gayéed'waang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: gayéed'wägan
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gayéed'aawaa
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: gayéed'aawaan
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: gayéed'waas
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: gayéed'aawaas
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: gayéed'waa.ang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: gayéed'aawaa.ang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gayéedang'waa
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gayéedang'waang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: gayéedang'waa.ang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'wägiinii
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'wägaangaa
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'wägaangaan
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: gayéed'waaäsaa
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: gayéed'waaäs
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: gayéed'waaäsaang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: gayéed'waaäsga
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: gayéed'waaäsaas
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: gayéed'waaäsaa.ang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gayéed'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: gayéed'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gayéed'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gayéed'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gayéed'waa'uuj
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gayéed'waa'uujang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: gayéed'waaäsaa'uujang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: gayéed'waa'us
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gayéed'waa'ujaa
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'waa'uujaangaa
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: gayéed'waaäsaa'us
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: gayéed'waa'ahlanggang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: gayéed'waa'ahlanggan
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'waa'ahlanggiinii
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: gayéed'waaäsaa'ahlans
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: gayéed'waa'ahlans
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: gayéed'aawaa'ahlang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: gayéed'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: gayéed'aawaa'ahlanggang
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: gayéed'waa'ahl
     gayéed+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: gayéed'waaäseehl
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: gayéed'ang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gayéed'angga
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gayéed'ang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gayéed'anggang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: gayéed'anggan
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gayéed'aangaa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: gayéed'aangaan
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: gayéed'ans
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: gayéed'aangaas
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: gayéed'angang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: gayéed'aangaa.ang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gayéed'anggang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gayéedang'anggang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: gayéedang'angang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'anggiinii
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'anggaangaa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'anggaangaan
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: gayéed'angäsaa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: gayéed'angäs
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: gayéed'angäsaang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: gayéed'angäsga
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: gayéed'angäsaas
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: gayéed'angäsaa.ang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gayéedang k̲asaa'áng
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gayéedang k̲asaa'ánggang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gayéedang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gayéedang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gayéed'ang'uuj
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gayéed'ang'uujang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: gayéed'angäsaa'uujang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: gayéed'ang'us
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gayéed'ang'ujaa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'ang'uujaangaa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: gayéed'angäsaa'us
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: gayéed'aang'ahlanggang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: gayéed'aang'ahlanggan
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'aang'ahlanggiinii
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: gayéed'angäsaa'ahlans
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: gayéed'aang'ahlans
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: gayéed'aangaa'ahlang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: gayéed'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: gayéed'aangaa'ahlanggang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: gayéed'aang'ahl
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: gayéed'angäseehl
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: gayéed'ang'uu
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gayéed'ang'waa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gayéed'ang'waa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gayéed'ang'waang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: gayéed'ang'wägan
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gayéed'ang'aawaa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: gayéed'ang'aawaan
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: gayéed'ang'waas
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: gayéed'ang'aawaas
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: gayéed'ang'waa.ang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: gayéed'ang'aawaa.ang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gayéedang'ang'waa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: gayéedang'ang'waang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: gayéedang'ang'waa.ang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'ang'wägiinii
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'ang'wägaangaa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'ang'wägaangaan
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: gayéed'ang'waaäsaa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: gayéed'ang'waaäs
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: gayéed'ang'waaäsaang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: gayéed'ang'waaäsga
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: gayéed'ang'waaäsaas
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: gayéed'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: gayéed'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: gayéed'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gayéed'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: gayéed'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: gayéed'ang'waa'uuj
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: gayéed'ang'waa'uujang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: gayéed'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: gayéed'ang'waa'us
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: gayéed'ang'waa'ujaa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: gayéed'ang'waaäsaa'us
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: gayéed'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: gayéed'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: gayéed'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: gayéed'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: gayéed'ang'waa'ahlans
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: gayéed'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: gayéed'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: gayéed'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: gayéed'ang'waa'ahl
     gayéed+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: gayéed'ang'waaäseehl
